Utah statutes.
73-3-3.   Permanent or temporary changes in point of diversion, place of
use, or purpose of use.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Permanent change" means a change for an indefinite period of time with
an intent to relinquish the original point of diversion, place of use, or
purpose of use.
(b)  "Temporary change" means a change for a fixed period of time not
exceeding one year.
(2) (a)  Any person entitled to the use of water may make permanent or
temporary changes in the:
(i)  point of diversion;
(ii)  place of use; or
(iii)  purpose of use for which the water was originally appropriated.
(b)  Except as provided by Section 73-3-30, a change may not be made if it
impairs a vested water right without just compensation.
(3)  A person entitled to use water shall change a point of diversion, place
of use, or purpose of water use, including water involved in a general
adjudication or other suit, in the manner provided in this section.
(4) (a)  A person entitled to use water may not make a change unless the state
engineer approves the change application.
(b)  A person entitled to use water shall submit a change application upon
forms furnished by the state engineer and shall set forth:
(i)  the applicant's name;
(ii)  the water right description;
(iii)  the water quantity;
(iv)  the stream or water source;
(v)  if applicable, the point on the stream or water source where the water is
diverted;
(vi)  if applicable, the point to which it is proposed to change the diversion
of the water;
(vii)  the place, purpose, and extent of the present use;
(viii)  the place, purpose, and extent of the proposed use; and
(ix)  any other information that the state engineer requires.
(5) (a)  The state engineer shall follow the same procedures, and the rights
and duties of the applicants with respect to applications for permanent
changes of point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use shall be the
same, as provided in this title for applications to appropriate water.
(b)  The state engineer may waive notice for a permanent change application
involving only a change in point of diversion of 660 feet or less.
(6) (a)  The state engineer shall investigate all temporary change
applications.
(b)  If the state engineer finds that the temporary change will not impair a
vested water right, the state engineer shall issue an order authorizing the
change.
(c)  If the state engineer finds that the change sought might impair a vested
water right, before authorizing the change, the state engineer shall give
notice of the application to any person whose right may be affected by the
change.
(d)  Before making an investigation or giving notice, the state engineer may
require the applicant to deposit a sum of money sufficient to pay the expenses
of the investigation and publication of notice.
(7) (a) Except as provided by Section 73-3-30, the state engineer may not
reject a permanent or temporary change application for the sole reason that
the change would impair a vested water right.
(b)  If otherwise proper, the state engineer may approve a permanent or
temporary change application for part of the water involved or upon the
condition that the applicant acquire the conflicting water right.
(8) (a) A person holding an approved application for the appropriation of
water may change the point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use.
(b)  A change of an approved application does not:
(i)  affect the priority of the original application; or
(ii)  extend the time period within which the construction of work is to begin
or be completed.
(9)  Any person who changes or who attempts to change a point of diversion,
place of use, or purpose of use, either permanently or temporarily, without
first applying to the state engineer in the manner provided in this section:
(a)  obtains no right;
(b)  is guilty of a crime punishable under Section 73-2-27 if the change or
attempted change is made knowingly or intentionally; and
(c)  is guilty of a separately punishable offense for each day of the unlawful
change.
(10) (a)  This section does not apply to the replacement of an existing well
by a new well drilled within a radius of 150 feet from the point of diversion
of the existing well.
(b)  Any replacement well must be drilled in accordance with the requirements
of Section 73-3-28.
